Hawaii statutes.
[§432:1‑107] Federal law
compliance. A mutual benefit society shall comply with applicable federal
law. The commissioner shall enforce the consumer protections and market
reforms relating to insurance as set forth in the federal Patient Protection
and Affordable Care Act, Public Law 111-148. [L 2011, c 15, §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next